Hawaii statutes.
§26-36 Acting members of boards. The
governor may appoint an acting member of any state board or commission to serve
during the temporary absence from the State or the illness of any regular
member thereof. The acting member shall, during the acting member's term of
service, have the same powers and duties as the regular member. [L 1931, c 48,
§1; RL 1935, §132; RL 1945, §481; RL 1955, §7-24; HRS §26-36; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next